Connecticut, session 2026, HB05456.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 29-1r of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) There is established a Department of Emergency Services and
Public Protection. Said department shall be the designated emergency
management and homeland security agency for the state. The
department head shall be the Commissioner of Emergency Services and
Public Protection, who shall be appointed by the Governor in
accordance with sections 4-5 to 4-8, inclusive, with the powers and
duties prescribed in said sections. The commissioner shall be
responsible for providing a coordinated, integrated program for the
protection of life and property and for state-wide emergency
management and homeland security. The commissioner shall appoint
not more than [two] three deputy commissioners who shall, under the
direction of the commissioner, assist in the administration of the
department. The commissioner may do all things necessary to apply for,
qualify for and accept any federal funds made available or allotted
under any federal act for emergency management or homeland security.
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 5456
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 29-1r(a)
PS Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2